California statutes. Public Contract Code
“Scrutinized company” means a company in Sudan that is involved in power production activities, mineral extraction activities, oil-related activities, or the production of military equipment, but excludes a company that can demonstrate any of the following:

(a) Its business operations are conducted under contract directly and exclusively with the regional government of southern Sudan.

(b) Its business operations are conducted under a license from the Office of Foreign Assets Control, or are expressly exempted under federal law from the requirement to be conducted under such a license.

(c) Its business operations consist of providing goods or services to marginalized populations of Sudan.

(d) Its business operations exclusively consist of providing goods or services to an internationally recognized peacekeeping force or humanitarian organization.

(e) Its business operations consist of providing goods or services that are used only to promote health or education.

(f) Its business operations with the Government of Sudan will be voluntarily suspended for the entire duration of the contract for goods or services for which they have bid on, or submitted a proposal for, a contract with a state agency.

(g) It has adopted, publicized, and is implementing a formal plan to cease business operations within one year and to refrain from conducting any new business operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10477.

(a) A scrutinized company is ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal for a contract with a state agency for goods or services.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Director of General Services may permit a scrutinized company, on a case-by-case basis, to bid on or submit a proposal for a contract with a state agency for goods or services, if it is in the best interests of the state to permit the scrutinized company to bid on or submit a proposal for one or more contracts with a state agency for goods or services.

(2) In making this determination, the Director of General Services may utilize the following resources:

(A) Verification by an independent third party or nonprofit organization that a company is doing either of the following:

(i) Undertaking significant humanitarian efforts in conjunction with an international organization, the Government of Sudan, the regional government of southern Sudan, or a nonprofit organization to benefit one or more marginalized populations of Sudan. The party or organization providing the verification or an independent third party must evaluate and certify that the significant humanitarian efforts are substantial in relation to the company’s Sudan business operations.

(ii) Through engagement with the Government of Sudan, materially improving conditions for the genocidally victimized population in Darfur.

(B) Consideration of a National Interest Waiver issued by the President of the United States excluding a company from the federal contract prohibitions provisions of the Sudan Accountability and Divestment Act (Public Law 110-174).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10478.

(a) A state agency shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to a contract for goods or services, that currently or within the previous three years has had business activities or other operations outside of the United States, to certify that the company is not a scrutinized company.

(b) A state agency shall not require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to a contract for goods or services, and that currently or within the previous three years has had business activities or other operations outside of the United States, to certify that the company is not a scrutinized company, if the company has obtained permission to bid on or submit a proposal for a contract with a state agency for goods or services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10477.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10479.

(a) If the Department of General Services determines that a company has submitted a false certification under Section 10478, the company shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The company is liable for a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal was submitted.

(2) The state agency or the Department of General Services may terminate the contract with the company.

(3) The company is ineligible to, and shall not, bid on a state contract for a period of not less than three years from the date the state agency determines that the company submitted the false certification.

(b) The Department of General Services shall report to the Attorney General the name of the company that the Department of General Services determined had submitted a false certification under Section 10478, together with its information as to the false certification, and the Attorney General shall determine whether to bring a civil action against the company. The company shall pay all costs and fees the plaintiff incurred in a civil action, including costs incurred by the state agency and the Department of General Services for investigations that led to the finding of the false certification and all costs and fees incurred by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10480.

This act shall be repealed upon affirmative action of the Legislature. Provided, that in determining whether to repeal this act, by way of suggestion and guidance only and without binding or in any way inhibiting the discretion of future sessions of the Legislature, it is submitted that the occurrence of any of the following should be construed and deemed to be a basis for repealing this act:

(a) The Congress or President of the United States declares the Darfur genocide has been halted for at least 12 months.

(b) The United States revokes all sanctions imposed against the Government of Sudan.

(c) The President of the United States has certified to Congress that the Government of Sudan has honored its commitments to do all of the following:

(1) Abide by United Nations Security Council Resolution 1769 (2007).

(2) Cease attacks on civilians.

(3) Demobilize and demilitarize the Janjaweed and associated militias.

(4) Grant free and unfettered access for delivery of humanitarian assistance.

(5) Allow for the safe and voluntary return of refugees and internally displaced persons.

(d) The Congress or President of the United States, through legislation or executive order, declares the contract prohibition of the type provided for in this act interferes with the conduct of United States foreign policy.

(e) Such other circumstances as the Legislature determines to warrant the discontinuance of the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: This section suggests conditions for future action repealing Article 13, commencing with Section 10475.)
-------------------------------------------

10481.

(a) If any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be invalid, illegal, unenforceable, or unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this act shall remain effective and functional notwithstanding such invalidity, illegality, unenforceability, or unconstitutionality.

(b) The Legislature hereby declares it would have passed this act, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word be declared invalid, illegal, unenforceable, or unconstitutional.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10490.

(a) A scrutinized company is ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal for a contract with a state agency for goods or services related to products or services that are the reason the company must comply with Section 13(p) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “scrutinized company” is a person that has been found to be in violation of Section 13(p) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by final judgment or settlement entered in a civil or administrative action brought by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission and the person has not remedied or cured the violation in a manner accepted by the commission on or before final judgment or settlement.

(c) A person shall cease to be regarded as a scrutinized company when the person is no longer deemed to be in violation of Section 13(p) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or upon filing by such person of an amended or corrective filing under Section 13(p) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, which filing corrects the violations described in subdivision (b), or after three years from the date of final judgment or settlement, whichever is earlier.

(d) The Department of General Services shall establish in the State Administrative Manual or the State Contracting Manual policies and procedures for all state agencies, departments, boards, and commissions to implement the contract prohibition of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “goods or services” includes goods and services subject to
 this chapter (commencing with Section 10290), information technology goods and services subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), and telecommunication goods and services subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12120).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 141.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Stats. 2011, Ch. 715, Sec. 2, which added this section, becomes inoperative on the date prescribed by Sec. 3 of Ch. 715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. University of California Competitive Bidding [10500. - 10527.]



  ARTICLE 1. Construction [10500. - 10506.]

10500.

As used in this article, “project” includes the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any University of California structure, building, road, or other improvement that will exceed in cost, including labor and materials, a total of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10500.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to facilitate the participation of small businesses, particularly small disadvantaged or minority business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises, in business contracting with the University of California. The Legislature intends that the Regents of the University of California adopt policies and procedures to ensure that a fair proportion of university contracts be placed with small business enterprises, particularly small disadvantaged, women, and disabled veteran business enterprises, in areas of commodity purchases, services, and construction contracts. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the regents adopt, by January 1, 1985, with respect to small business enterprises, particularly small disadvantaged and women business enterprises, and by January 1, 1992, with respect to disabled veteran business enterprises, policies and procedures that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Annual targets for utilization of small businesses, particularly disadvantaged business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises, including subcontracts for construction.

(b) Annual statistical reports on the participation of small businesses, particularly disadvantaged business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises, as general contractors and subcontractors in each project.

(c) Outreach programs.

(d) Directories of disadvantaged business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(e) Monitoring by the regents of progress with respect to the utilization of disadvantaged business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

It is also the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California report annually to the Legislature, on or before each July 1, on the participation of small disadvantaged business enterprises, women business enterprises, and disabled veteran business enterprises in university business contracting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the Regents of the University of California shall let any contract for a project to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids. However, if one or more of the bids is substantially equal to the lowest bid, and at least one of those bidders is a disadvantaged business enterprise, a women business enterprise, or a disabled veteran business enterprise, the regents may award the contract in accordance with the policies and procedures adopted pursuant to Section 10500.5. If the regents deem it to be for the best interest of the university, the regents may, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, award it to the second lowest responsible bidder. If the second lowest bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the regents may likewise award it to the third lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 516, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

The Regents of the University of California shall give public notice of a project to bidders by publication twice within the 60-day period preceding the day set for the receiving of bids as follows:

(a) Either in one newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the major portion of the project is located and in one such trade paper circulated in the county in which the major portion of the work is to be done or electronically on the Internet Web site of the university.

(b) The notices shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids, describe in general terms the work to be done, and describe
 the bidding mode by which the lowest responsible bidder will be selected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 687, Sec. 12.   (SB 876)   Effective September 27, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

Before entering into any contract for a project, the Regents of the University of California shall cause to be prepared estimates and either:

(a) Complete plans and specifications setting forth such directions as will enable a competent mechanic or other builder to carry them out.

(b) Documents for the solicitation of bids on a design-and-build basis, including: (1) a program setting forth the scope of the project, the size, type, and desired design character of the buildings and the site, (2) a set of performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, and workmanship, (3) a maximum acceptance cost, and (4) a method and grading system for evaluating contractor proposals on the basis of a preliminary design, outline specifications, a price, and the financial condition and relevant experience of the contractor and the contractor’s architect.

(c) Documents for the solicitation of bids for construction manager mode of contracting including prequalification standards, schematic plans, and outline specifications indicating the general scope of the project and the designation of those fees and other fixed commitments upon which prequalified contractors will be invited to submit competitive bids which will serve as the basis for selection.

(d) Documents for the solicitation of bids on a cost-plus fee mode of contracting, including prequalification standards, outline specifications, and schematic drawings generally describing the scope of the work, a definition of reimbursable and nonreimbursable costs, and the designation of fees and other fixed costs upon which prequalified contractors will be invited to submit quotations which will provide the basis for selection.

(e) Documents for the solicitation of bids under such other contracting mode as the regents determine to be in the best interest of the university, provided that such proposals be compared on a uniform basis and that award be made as determined by the published selection standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10504.5 or 10506, work on all projects shall be performed under contract awarded in accordance with Section 10501, except that it may be done on a time and materials basis, by contract upon informal bids, by University of California employees, by day labor under the direction of the regents, or by a combination thereof, in case of emergency due to an act of God, earthquake, flood, storm, fire, landslide, public disturbance, vandalism, or failure that causes damage to a university-owned building or structure, university-owned real property, or any improvements thereon, when that work or those remedial measures are required immediately and are necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.5.

(a) Where the nature of the work, in the opinion of the Regents of the University of California, is such that the application of all of the provisions of this chapter in connection with that work is not required, and the cost of the project does not exceed six hundred forty thousand dollars ($640,000), the regents shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids.

(b) (1) The Regents of the University of California shall establish a procedure to qualify and rate a bidder for work to be awarded pursuant to subdivision (a) when the cost of the project exceeds three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) but
 does not exceed six hundred forty thousand dollars ($640,000).

(2) The procedures shall require a bidder to complete and submit a qualification questionnaire. The qualification questionnaire shall cover, at a minimum, the issues covered by the Model Pre-qualification Questionnaire developed in 1999 by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20101. The procedures shall also require a bidder to complete and submit a financial statement, unless the bidder is a contractor who has qualified as a Small Business Administration entity pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code. A bidder who is required to complete and submit a qualification questionnaire shall include the general contractor and, if utilized, the electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractor, except that the nonqualification of a subcontractor shall not disqualify an otherwise qualified contractor.

(3) Each campus or facility shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating a bidder on the basis of the completed qualification questionnaire and, if available, financial statements to determine the minimum requirements permitted for qualification to submit a bid. Each campus or facility may process qualification questionnaires and financial statements on a quarterly basis to qualify a prospective bidder for a period of one calendar year from the date of qualification.

(4) Upon award to the lowest responsible bidder, each campus or facility shall publicly post on its Internet Web site a brief description of the project and the awarded amount along with the name of the contractor who is the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   (SB 502)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

(a) The Regents of the University of California may perform projects with university employees if the regents deem that the award of a contract, the acceptance of bids, or the acceptance of further bids is not in the best interests of the university, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The value of the project to be so performed shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) The project is for the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of experimental, diagnostic, or specialized research equipment.

(b) This section does not apply to the painting or repainting of a structure, building, road, or improvement of any kind if the value of the painting or repainting project exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 563, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

The requirements of Sections 10501, 10502, and 10503 shall not be applicable to (1) any project of which the Regents of the University of California is only part owner, or (2) any project funded by a federal agency to the extent that requirements of Sections 10501, 10502, and 10503 are in conflict with mandatory requirements of such federal agency, or (3) projects performed pursuant to Section 10505.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Best Value Construction Contracting Program [10506.4. - 10506.10.]

10506.4.

(a) This article provides the Best Value Construction Contracting Program for the Regents of the University of California for projects over one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) The Regents of the University of California shall let any contract for a project pursuant to this article to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids.

(c) The lowest responsible bidder may be selected on the basis of the best value to the university, as defined in Section 10506.5. In order to implement this method of selection, the Regents of the University of California shall adopt and publish procedures and required guidelines
 for evaluating the qualifications of the bidders that ensure that best value selections by the university are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These procedures and guidelines shall conform to the requirements of Sections 10506.6 and 10506.7 and shall be mandatory for the university when using best value selection.

(d) If one or more of the bids is substantially equal to the lowest bid, and at least one of those bidders is a disadvantaged business enterprise, a women business enterprise, or a disabled veteran business enterprise, the Regents of the University of California may award the contract in accordance with the policies and procedures adopted pursuant to Section 10500.5.

(e) If the Regents of the University of California deem it to be for the best interest of the
 university, the regents may, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder for a project to execute a tendered contract, award it to the second lowest responsible bidder. If the second lowest responsible bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the regents may likewise award it to the third lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 850, Sec. 2.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.5.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the lowest responsible bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(b) “Best value contract” means a contract entered into pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(c) “Best value contractor” means a properly licensed person, firm, or corporation that submits a bid for, or is awarded, a best value
 contract.

(d) “Demonstrated management competency” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity of the proposed management staffing to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(e) “Financial condition” means the financial resources needed to perform the contract. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s financial condition shall include, at a minimum, capacity to obtain all required payment bonds, performance bonds, and liability insurance.

(f) “Labor compliance” means the ability to comply with, and past performance with, contract and statutory requirements for the payment of wages and qualifications of the workforce. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s labor compliance shall
 include, as a minimum, the bidder’s ability to comply with the apprenticeship requirements of the California Apprenticeship Council and the Department of Industrial Relations, its past conformance with such requirements, and its past conformance with requirements to pay prevailing wages on public works projects.

(g) “Project labor agreement” means a prehire collective bargaining agreement that establishes terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project or projects and is an agreement described in Section 158(f) of Title 29 of the United States Code. 

(h) “Qualifications” means financial condition, relevant experience, demonstrated management competency, labor compliance, the safety record of the bidder, and, if required by the bidding documents, some
 or all of the preceding qualifications as they pertain to subcontractors proposed to be used by the bidder for designated portions of the work.

(i) “Relevant experience” means the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity.

(j) “Safety record” means the prior history concerning the safe performance of construction contracts. The criteria used to evaluate a bidder’s safety record shall include, as a minimum, its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period.

(k) “University” means all locations of the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 850, Sec. 3.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.6.

The university shall proceed in accordance with the following when awarding best value contracts under this article.

(a) The university shall prepare a solicitation for bids and give notice pursuant to Section 10502.

(b) The university shall establish a procedure to prequalify bidders. The information required pursuant to this section shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information submitted by the bidder as part of the evaluation process shall not be open to public inspection to the extent that information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records
 Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) (1) A best value contractor shall not be prequalified or short-listed unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the Regents of the University of California that the best value contractor and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Sections 10506.8 and 10506.9.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(A) The Regents of the University of California have entered into
 a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the Regents of the University of California prior to January 1, 2018.

(C) The best value contractor has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same
 meaning as in subdivision (g) of Section 10506.5.

(d) Each solicitation for bids shall do all of the following:

(1) Invite prequalified bidders to submit sealed bids in the manner prescribed by this article.

(2) Include a section identifying and describing the following:

(A) Criteria that the university will consider in evaluating the qualifications of the bidders.

(B) The methodology and rating or weighting system that will be used by the university in evaluating bids.

(C) The relative importance or weight assigned to the criteria for evaluating
 the qualifications of bidders identified in the request for bids.

(e) Final evaluation of the best value contractor shall be done in a manner that prevents cost or price information from being revealed to the committee evaluating the qualifications of the bidders prior to completion and announcement of that committee’s decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 358.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.7.

Selection of the best value contractor shall be made as follows:

(a) The university shall evaluate the qualifications of the bidders based solely upon the criteria set forth in the solicitation documents, and shall assign a qualifications score to each bid.

(b) The award of the contract shall be made to the bidder whose bid is determined, by the university in writing, to be the best value to the university. To determine the best value contractor, the university shall divide each bidder’s price by its qualifications score. The lowest resulting cost per quality point will represent the best value bid.

(c) The university shall issue a written decision of its contract award.

(d) Upon issuance of a contract award, the university shall publicly announce its award identifying the best value contractor to which the award is made, the project, the project price, and the selected best value contractor’s score based on the qualifications criteria for evaluating the bidders listed in the request for bids. The notice of award shall be made public and include the score of the selected best value contractor in relation to all other responsive bidders and their respective prices. The contract file shall include documentation sufficient to support the decision to award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 636, Sec. 4.   (SB 835)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.8.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Apprenticeable occupation” means an occupation for which the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations has approved an apprenticeship program pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code before January 1, 2014.

(b) “Chief” means the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) “Graduate of an apprenticeship program” means either of the following:

(1) An individual
 who has been issued a certificate of completion under the authority of the California Apprenticeship Council for completing an apprenticeship program approved by the chief pursuant to Section 3075 of the Labor Code.

(2) An individual who has completed an apprenticeship program located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(d) “Skilled and trained workforce” means a workforce that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) All of the workers performing work in an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades are either skilled journeypersons or apprentices registered in an apprenticeship
 program approved by the chief.

(2) (A) For work performed on or after January 1, 2017, at least 30 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work in the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation. This requirement shall not apply to work performed in the occupation of teamster.

(B) For work performed on or after January 1, 2018, at least 40
 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work in the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation. This requirement shall not apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter, modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer, setter, or finisher. 

(C) For work performed on or after January 1, 2019, at least 50 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation. This requirement shall not apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter, modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer,
 setter, or finisher.

(D) For work performed on or after January 1, 2020, at least 60 percent of the skilled journeypersons employed to perform work on the contract or project by every contractor and each of its subcontractors at every tier are graduates of an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation. This requirement shall not apply to work performed in the following occupations: acoustical installer, bricklayer, carpenter, cement mason, drywall installer or lather, marble mason, finisher, or setter,
 modular furniture or systems installer, operating engineer, pile driver, plasterer, roofer or waterproofer, stone mason, surveyor, teamster, terrazzo worker or finisher, and tile layer, setter, or finisher.

(3) For an applicable occupation in which no apprenticeship program had been approved by the chief before January 1, 1995, up to one-half of the graduation percentage requirement of paragraph (2) may be satisfied by skilled journeypersons who commenced working in the apprenticeable occupation before the chief’s approval of an apprenticeship program for that occupation in the county in which the project is located.

(4) The apprenticeship graduation percentage requirements of paragraph (2) are satisfied if, in a calendar month, either of the following occurs:

(A) At least the required percentage of the skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor to perform work on the contract or project meet the graduation percentage requirements.

(B) For the hours of work performed by skilled journeypersons employed by the contractor or subcontractor on the contract or project, the percentage of hours performed by skilled journeypersons who meet the graduation requirement is at least equal to the required graduation percentage.

(5) The contractor or subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship graduation requirements of paragraph (2) if, during the calendar month, the contractor or subcontractor employs skilled journeypersons to perform fewer than 10 hours
 of work on the contract or project.

(6) A subcontractor need not meet the apprenticeship requirements of paragraph (2) if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The subcontractor was not a listed subcontractor under Section 4104 or a substitute for a listed subcontractor.

(B) The subcontract does not exceed one-half of 1 percent of the price of the prime contract.

(e) “Skilled journeyperson” means a worker who either:

(1) Graduated from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that was approved by the chief or located outside California and approved for federal purposes pursuant
 to the apprenticeship regulations adopted by the federal Secretary of Labor.

(2) Has at least as many hours of on-the-job experience in the applicable occupation as would be required to graduate from an apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation that is approved by the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 850, Sec. 5.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.9.

(a) If a contractor, bidder, or other entity is required to provide an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete a contract or project, the commitment shall be made in an enforceable agreement with the university that provides both of the following:

(1) The contractor, bidder, or other entity, and its contractors and subcontractors at every tier, will comply with this article.

(2) The contractor, bidder, or other entity shall provide to the university, on a monthly basis while the project contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with this article.

(b) If the contractor, bidder, or other entity fails to provide the monthly report required by this section, or provides a report that is incomplete, the university shall withhold further payments until a complete record is provided.

(c) If a monthly report does not demonstrate compliance with this article, the university shall withhold further payments until the contractor, bidder, or other entity provides a plan to achieve substantial compliance with this article, with respect to the relevant apprenticeable occupation, prior to completion of the contract or project.

(d) A monthly report provided to the university shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section
 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 359.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.10.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article is not intended to change in any manner any guideline, criteria, procedure, or requirement of the Regents of the University of California to let any contract for a project to the lowest responsible bidder or else reject all bids.
